test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-patsas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - patsas: # Noun 'statue'
     patsas+N+Sg+Nom: patsas
     patsas+N+Sg+Gen: patsaan
     patsas+N+Sg+Acc: patsaan
     patsas+N+Sg+Part: patsasta
     patsas+N+Sg+Ill: patsaasse
     patsas+N+Sg+Ine: patsaas
     patsas+N+Sg+Ela: patsaast
     patsas+N+Sg+All: patsaalle
     patsas+N+Sg+Ade: patsaal
     patsas+N+Sg+Abl: patsaalt
     patsas+N+Sg+Tra: patsaaks
     patsas+N+Sg+Ess: patsaanna
     patsas+N+Sg+Exe: patsaant

     patsas+N+Pl+Nom: patsaat
     patsas+N+Pl+Gen: patsain
     patsas+N+Pl+Acc: patsaat
     patsas+N+Pl+Part: patsaita
     patsas+N+Pl+Ill: patsaisse
     patsas+N+Pl+Ine: patsais
     patsas+N+Pl+Ela: patsaist
     patsas+N+Pl+All: patsaille
     patsas+N+Pl+Ade: patsail
     patsas+N+Pl+Abl: patsailt
     patsas+N+Pl+Tra: patsaiks
     patsas+N+Pl+Ess: patsainna
     patsas+N+Pl+Exe: patsaint
